Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1093.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16620. The terms of office of individual members of the board and task force created under this part, except those appointed to fill vacancies, expire 4 years after appointment on June 30 of the year in which the term will expire. Enacting section 1. Section 16624 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.16624, is repealed.